District of Columbia statutes.
34-805

People’s Counsel — Appropriations.

There are authorized to be appropriated, to carry out the purposes of §§ 34-804 and 34-912, such sums as may be necessary for fiscal year 1980 and for each fiscal year thereafter.

History

Jan. 2, 1975, 88 Stat. 1977, Pub. L. 93-614, § 3
Oct. 20, 1979, D.C. Law 3-34, § 2, 26 DCR 1119

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-407.
1973 Ed., § 43-205a.